New York, session 2025-2026, A5118.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2807-g to read as follows: 3 § 2807-g. Auto-immune disease treatment centers. 1. For the purposes 4 of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Auto-immune disease treatment center project" shall mean the 6 construction, reconstruction, renovation, rehabilitation, refurbishing, 7 expansion, upgrading, or equipping of an auto-immune disease treatment 8 center. 9 (b) "Hospital" shall mean a public hospital located in the state that 10 is operated by a county or municipality and receives state funding for 11 its operations. 12 2. The commissioner shall require that all hospitals as defined in 13 this section shall establish and implement an auto-immune disease treat- 14 ment center. 15 3. (a) The commissioner is authorized to make funds of the department 16 available to hospitals for auto-immune disease treatment center 17 projects. 18 (b) Such funds may be provided pursuant to the provisions of section 19 twenty-eight hundred twenty-six of this article or any other provision 20 of law or regulation deemed to be appropriate by the commissioner for 21 carrying out the purposes of this section. 22 4. The office of health equity, as established by section two hundred 23 forty-one as amended by chapter 523 of the laws of 2022, of this chap- 24 ter, shall assist the commissioner in allocating and distributing such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08162-01-5 A. 5118 2 1 funds pursuant to subdivision two of this section, including the devel- 2 opment of a methodology or procedure therefor. 3 5. The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations neces- 4 sary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 5 6. The commissioner shall report annually to the governor and the 6 legislature all monies allocated and distributed pursuant to this 7 section. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 10 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 11 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 12 before such effective date.